Hawaii statutes.
§431:10B-114 Penalties. In addition to
any other penalty provided by law, any person, firm or corporation which
violates an order of the commissioner after it has become final, and while the
order is in effect, shall, upon proof thereof to the satisfaction of the court,
forfeit and pay to this State a sum not to exceed $250 for each violation which
may be recovered in a civil action; except that if the violation is found to be
wilful, the amount of the penalty shall be a sum not to exceed $1,000. The commissioner,
in the commissioner's discretion, may revoke or suspend the license or
certificate of authority of the person, firm or corporation guilty of the
violation. An order for suspension or revocation shall be upon notice and
hearing, and shall be subject to judicial review. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next